District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Strengthening Arts in Schools Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 3(b) of the State Education Office Establishment Act of 2000, effective
October 21, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-176; D.C. Code – 38-2602(b)) is amended by adding a new
paragraph (34) to read as follows:


“(34)(A) Establish an Arts Liaison position within the Office of the State
Superintendent of Education (“OSSE”) regarding arts curriculum and arts standards in DC Public
Charter Schools (“DCPCS”) and DC Public Schools (“DCPS”).
“(B) In addition to any other duties the OSSE may assign, the Arts Liaison
shall:
“(i) partner with Local Education Agencies (“LEAs”) and other
relevant stakeholders to develop state-level arts standards;
“(ii) partner with LEAs to strengthen arts curricula and instruction;
“(iii) serve as the primary communication point for arts-related
issues at LEAs;
“(iv) provide arts-related guidance and support to school
administrators and teachers at LEAs;
“(v) support professional development opportunities for arts
teachers at LEAs; and
“(vi) partner with arts organizations to provide resources,
opportunities, and organize events for LEAs.
“(C) For the purposes of this paragraph, the term “arts” shall have the
same meaning as provided in section 3(2) of the Commission on the Arts and Humanities Act,
effective October 21, 1975 (D.C. Law 1-22; D.C. Code § 39-202(5)).”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).


Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.